client/braille/liblouis/tables/en-ueb-g2.ctb
contraction abface      aboutface
contraction abturn      aboutturn
contraction acly        accordingly
contraction aclys
contraction afbattle    afterbattle
contraction afburn      afterburn
contraction afclap      afterclap
contraction afdamp      afterdamp
contraction afdeck      afterdeck
contraction afgame      aftergame
contraction aflife      afterlife
contraction aflives     afterlives
contraction afntea      afternoontea
contraction afpiece     afterpiece
contraction afplay      afterplay
contraction afsale      aftersale
contraction aftax       aftertax
contraction aftaxes     aftertaxes
contraction aftea       aftertea
contraction blfold      blindfold
contraction blly        blindly
contraction blman       blindman
contraction blside      blindside
contraction blworm      blindworm
contraction bloodlr     bloodletter
contraction boyfr       boyfriend
contraction brld        brailled
contraction brlr        brailler
contraction brlrs
contraction brls
contraction brlx
contraction brly        brailley
contraction colorbl     colorblind
contraction cda         coulda
contraction cds
contraction dcvd        deceived
contraction dcvr        deceiver
contraction dcvrs
contraction dcvs
contraction dcld        declared
contraction dclr        declarer
contraction dclrs
contraction dcls
contraction defr        defriend
contraction defr        defriend
contraction eis
contraction feelgd      feelgood
contraction frlies      friendlies
contraction frly        friendly
contraction gadab       gadabout
contraction galfr       galfriend
contraction girlfr      girlfriend
contraction gdafn       goodafternoon
contraction gdby        goodby
contraction gdbye       goodbye
contraction gdhumor     goodhumor
contraction gdie        goodie
contraction gdlook      goodlook
contraction gdly        goodly
contraction gdman       goodman
contraction gdnature    goodnature
contraction gdsize      goodsize
contraction gdun        goodun
contraction gdwife      goodwife
contraction gdwill      goodwill
contraction gdwives     goodwives
contraction gdy         goody
contraction grtaunt     greataunt
contraction grtcircle   greatcircle
contraction grtcoat     greatcoat
contraction grtly       greatly
contraction grtnephew   greatnephew
contraction grtniece    greatniece
contraction grtuncle    greatuncle
contraction guyfr       guyfriend
contraction hatelr      hateletter
word herfs =
contraction hmbo        himbo
contraction hmboes      himboes
contraction hmfs
contraction illpd       illpaid
contraction immly       immediately
contraction immlys
contraction imms
contraction xfs
contraction knockab     knockabout
contraction ladyfr      ladyfriend
contraction layab       layabout
contraction lrbodies    letterbodies
contraction lrbody      letterbody
contraction lrbomb      letterbomb
contraction lrbox       letterbox
contraction lrboxes     letterboxes
contraction lrman       letterman
contraction lrpress     letterpress
contraction lrpresses   letterpresses
contraction lrspace     letterspace
contraction lrtext      lettertext
contraction lld         littled
contraction llneck      littleneck
contraction llr         littler
contraction lovelr      loveletter
contraction manfr       manfriend
word mchs =
contraction midafn      midafternoon
contraction misbrl      misbraille
contraction misbrld     misbrailled
contraction missd       missaid
word msta =
word msts =
word msty =
contraction myfs
contraction necs
contraction neis
contraction newslr      newsletter
contraction newslrs
word onefs =
word ourvss =
contraction pds
word percvd =
word percvg =
word percvr =
word percvrs =
word percvs =
contraction poorlypd    poorlypaid
contraction prcv        preceive
contraction prcvr       preceiver
contraction prcvg       preceiving
contraction prepd       prepaid
contraction prepds
contraction purbl       purblind
contraction purblly     purblindly
contraction qkdraw      quickdraw
contraction qkfire      quickfire
contraction qkfreeze    quickfreeze
contraction qkfroze     quickfroze
contraction qkie        quickie
contraction qklime      quicklime
contraction qkly        quickly
contraction qkset       quickset
contraction qksnap      quicksnap
contraction qky         quicky
contraction rebrl       rebraille
contraction rebrld      rebrailled
contraction rebrlr      rebrailler
contraction rcvd        received
contraction rcvr        receiver
contraction rcvrs
contraction rcvs
contraction rjcd        rejoiced
contraction rjcr
contraction rjcrs
contraction rjcs        rejoicer
contraction rjcgly      rejoicingly
contraction rjcglys
contraction relr        reletter
contraction repd        repaid
contraction repds
contraction runab       runabout
word schs =
contraction sds
word shds =
contraction tds
word tgrness =
contraction tgrs
word themvss =
word thyfs =
contraction tms
contraction tns
contraction turnab      turnabout
contraction unac        unaccording
contraction unacly      unaccordingly
contraction unaclys
contraction unacs	
contraction unblfold    unblindfold
contraction unbrl       unbraille
contraction unbrld      unbrailled
contraction undcv       undeceive
contraction undcvd      undeceived
contraction undcvr      undeceiver
contraction undcvs
contraction undcvg      undeceiving
contraction undcl       undeclare
contraction undcld      undeclared
contraction undcls
contraction unfr        unfriend
contraction unfrly      unfriendly
contraction unnec       unnecessary
contraction unnecs
contraction unpd        unpaid
contraction unpds
word unpercv =
word unpercvd =
word unpercvg =
word unpercvrr =
word unpercvs =
contraction unqk        unquick
contraction unrcvd      unreceived
contraction unrjc       unrejoice
contraction unrjcd      unrejoiced
contraction unrjcr      unrejoicer
contraction unrjcs
contraction unrjcg      unrejoicing
contraction unrjcgly    unrejoicingly
contraction unrepd      unrepaid
contraction unsd        unsaid
contraction unsds
contraction walkab      walkabout
contraction wds
contraction wellpd      wellpaid
contraction womanfr     womanfriend
contraction wda         woulda
contraction yrs
contraction yrfs
contraction yrvss

#   Appendix 1.2

#sufword acrosses 1-14-1235-135-234-234-15-234


#   misc

sufword preadmit 1234-1235-15-1-145-134-24-2345
word rared 1235-1-1235-1246

contraction blc
contraction bldg
contraction blt
contraction blvd
contraction llb
contraction llc
contraction lld
contraction llp

contraction .com
contraction .org
contraction .gov
contraction .edu
contraction .mil
contraction .net

word   somesch 234-135-134-15-234-14-125

contraction blcup
contraction grtsamada

# Shape symbols require a grade 1 indicator (Section 3.22.1)
contraction \x25a0 ■ filled (solid) square
contraction \x25a1 □ square
contraction \x25a7 ▧ shaded square (upper left to lower right)
contraction \x25b2 ▲ filled (solid) (equilateral) triangle
contraction \x25b3 △ regular (equilateral) triangle
contraction \x25cb ○ circle
contraction \x25cd ◍ shaded circle



# Punctuation in strange places require grade 1 indicator
# note, forward direction handled with match elsewhere

nofor always , 56-2
nofor always ; 56-23
nofor always : 56-25
nofor always . 56-256
nofor always ! 56-235
nofor always ? 56-236
